Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2001 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "In the Child's
Best Interest Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2002 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 16027 Page 1

For the purposes of this act:
1. "Adult female" means an individual who is eighteen (18)
years of age or older and biologically female;
2. "Adult male" means an individual who is eighteen (18) years
of age or older and biologically male;
3. "Adoption" means the legal process by which a person or
persons become the legal parent or parents of a child;
4. "Biological relative" means a person related to the child by
blood, including, but not limited to, parents, grandparents,
siblings, aunts, uncles, or cousins;
5. "Foster care" means the temporary placement of a child in a
home licensed or approved by the state for the purpose of providing
care and supervision; and
6. "Legal guardianship" means the legal authority granted by a
court to a person or persons to make decisions regarding the care,
custody, and welfare of a child.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2003 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In order to promote the best interest of the child, all
adoptive, fostering, or legal guardianship arrangements approved or
recognized by any court, agency, or entity in the State of Oklahoma
shall consist of either:
1. One able and willing adult;
Req. No. 16027 Page 2

2. Two able and willing adults comprising one adult female and
one adult male; or
3. Two able and willing adults, both of whom are biological
relatives of the child.
B. The official adoptive, fostering, or legal guardianship
arrangements shall be limited to no more than two positions and
shall only be reserved for an adult female and an adult male,
conjointly, or for a single adult as provided in subsection A of
this section.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2004 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Nothing in this act shall prohibit other adults, including,
but not limited, to grandparents, relatives, or friends of the
adoptive parents, foster parents, or legal guardians, from assisting
in the care of the child in the approved home or in the child's
everyday life.
B. Biological relatives of the child or of the adoptive
parents, foster parents, or legal guardians may assist in caring for
the child, provided such assistance does not alter the official
adoptive, fostering, or legal guardianship arrangements, which shall
remain limited to the provisions set forth in subsection A of
Section 3 of this act.

Req. No. 16027 Page 3

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2005 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If any adoption, foster care placement, or legal
guardianship is found to violate the provisions of this act, the
courts of the State of Oklahoma shall declare such arrangement void
and not recognized by the state.
B. Upon a finding of violation, the state, through the
Department of Human Services or other appropriate agency, shall
immediately work to find a safe and suitable home for the child.
Placement shall be made with either:
1. One able and willing adult;
2. Two able and willing adults comprising one adult male and
one adult female; or
3. Two able and willing adults, both of whom are biological
relatives of the child.
C. In determining placement under subsection B of this section,
the state shall give preference to adults who are biologically
related to the child in the closest degree of kinship, provided such
relatives are proven to be safe and suitable for the child through
background checks, home studies, and other evaluations required by
state law.


Req. No. 16027 Page 4

SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16027 CMA 01/30/26





















Req. No. 16027 Page 5